California, session 20252026, AB1664.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Under existing law, the Secretary of State is the chief elections officer of the state and must see that elections are efficiently conducted and that state election laws are enforced.(b) Under existing law, the Attorney General is the chief law officer of the state and must see that the laws of the state are uniformly and adequately enforced.(c) California has a sovereign interest in creating and enforcing laws for the administration of elections, which it has exercised by adopting a comprehensive scheme for the conduct of elections.(d) The Secretary of State, the Attorney General, and the state are injured and aggrieved by law enforcement’s improper search, seizure, and retention of election materials, including election records and certified voting technology or any portion thereof, which can frustrate election administration and undermine public confidence in election integrity.SEC. 2. Section 23 is added to the Elections Code, to read:23. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Certified voting technology” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17600.(2) “Election records” include, but are not limited to, any records that must be kept, retained, preserved, or sealed by elections officials under this code.(3) “Law enforcement investigation” means an investigation undertaken by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency.(b) A local agency, political subdivision, or elections official shall provide written notice to the Secretary of State and the Attorney General immediately, but no later than one calendar day day, after becoming aware of any warrant, subpoena, or active law enforcement investigation pertaining to the search, seizure, or retention of any election records or certified voting technology, or any portion thereof, under their custody or control.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Secretary of State or the Attorney General may, as to any matter described in subdivision (b), intervene in any court proceedings connected therewith, or initiate proceedings in any court to challenge a warrant or subpoena described in this section on any valid grounds or seek any other appropriate relief. An action pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to calendar preference.(d) This section does not require the Secretary of State or the Attorney General to take any action regarding any warrant, subpoena, or active law enforcement investigation of which they receive notice pursuant to this section.(e) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order for this bill to take effect in time for the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.